Utah statutes.
26-4-14.   Certification of death by attending physician -- Deaths without medical attendance -- Cause of death uncertain -- Notice requirements.

The physician in attendance at the last illness of a deceased person who, in the judgment of the physician, does not appear to have died in a manner described in Section 26-4-7, shall certify the cause of death to his best knowledge and belief. When there is no physician in attendance during the last illness or when an attending physician is unable to determine with reasonable certainty the cause of death, the physician or person with custody of the body shall so notify the medical examiner. If the medical examiner has reason to believe there may be criminal responsibility for the death, he shall notify the district attorney or county attorney having criminal jurisdiction or the head of the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction to make further investigation of the death.

